Utah statutes.
11-39-103.   Requirements for undertaking a building improvement or public
works project -- Request for bids -- Authority to reject bids.
(1)  If the estimated cost of the building improvement or public works project
exceeds the bid limit, the local entity shall, if it determines to proceed
with the building improvement or public works project:
(a)  request bids for completion of the building improvement or public works
project by:
(i) (A)  publishing notice at least twice in a newspaper published or of
general circulation in the local entity at least five days before opening the
bids; or
(B)  if there is no newspaper published or of general circulation in the local
entity as described in Subsection (1)(a)(i)(A), posting notice at least five
days before opening the bids in at least five public places in the local
entity and leaving the notice posted for at least three days; and
(ii)  publishing notice in accordance with Section 45-1-101, at least five
days before opening the bids; and
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3), enter into a contract for the
completion of the building improvement or public works project with:
(i)  the lowest responsive responsible bidder; or
(ii)  for a design-build project that the local entity began formulating
before March 1, 2004 and with respect to which a contract is entered into
before September 1, 2004, a responsible bidder that:
(A)  offers design-build services; and
(B)  satisfies the local entity's criteria relating to financial strength,
past performance, integrity, reliability, and other factors that the local
entity uses to assess the ability of a bidder to perform fully and in good
faith the contract requirements for a design-build project.
(2) (a)  Each notice under Subsection (1)(a) shall indicate that the local
entity may reject any or all bids submitted.
(b) (i)  The cost of a building improvement or public works project may not be
divided to avoid:
(A)  exceeding the bid limit; and
(B)  subjecting the local entity to the requirements of this section.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b)(i), a local entity may divide the cost
of a building improvement or public works project that would, without
dividing, exceed the bid limit if the local entity complies with the
requirements of this section with respect to each part of the building
improvement or public works project that results from dividing the cost.
(3) (a)  The local entity may reject any or all bids submitted.
(b)  If the local entity rejects all bids submitted but still intends to
undertake the building improvement or public works project, the local entity
shall again request bids by following the procedure provided in Subsection
(1)(a).
(c)  If, after twice requesting bids by following the procedure provided in
Subsection (1)(a), the local entity determines that no satisfactory bid has
been submitted, the governing body may undertake the building improvement or
public works project as it considers appropriate.
